Utah statutes.
63M-11-201.   Composition -- Appointments -- Terms -- Removal.

(1)  The commission shall be composed of 21 voting members as follows:

(a)  one senator, appointed by the president of the Senate;

(b)  one representative, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(c)  the executive director of the Department of Health;

(d)  the executive director of the Department of Human Services;

(e)  the executive director of the Governor's Office of Economic Development;

(f)  the executive director of the Department of Workforce Services; and

(g)  15 voting members, appointed by the governor, representing each of the following:

(i)  the Utah Association of Area Agencies on Aging;

(ii)  higher education in Utah;

(iii)  the business community;

(iv)  the Utah Association of Counties;

(v)  the Utah League of Cities and Towns;

(vi)  charitable organizations;

(vii)  the health care provider industry;

(viii)  financial institutions;

(ix)  the legal profession;

(x)  the public safety sector;

(xi)  public transportation;

(xii)  ethnic minorities;

(xiii)  the industry that provides long-term care for the elderly;

(xiv)  organizations or associations that advocate for the aging population; and

(xv)  the general public.

(2) (a)  A member appointed under Subsection (1)(g) shall serve a two-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the term requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the governor may adjust the length of the initial commission members' terms to ensure that the terms are staggered so that approximately 1/2 of the members appointed under Subsection (1)(g) are appointed each year.

(c)  When, for any reason, a vacancy occurs in a position appointed by the governor under Subsection (1)(g), the governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the commission member being replaced.

(d)  Members appointed under Subsection (1)(g) may be removed by the governor for cause.

(e)  A member appointed under Subsection (1)(g) shall be removed from the commission and replaced by the governor if the member is absent for three consecutive meetings of the commission without being excused by the chair of the commission.

(3)  In appointing the members under Subsection (1)(g), the governor shall:

(a)  take into account the geographical makeup of the commission; and

(b)  strive to appoint members who are knowledgeable or have an interest in issues relating to the aging population.

